src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - кол: # Noun 122 'eng home/fin koti' - full paradigm
#
     кол+N+Sg+Nom: кол
     кол+N+Sg+Lat: колн
     кол+N+Sg+Abl: колныл
     кол+N+Sg+Ins: колыл
     кол+N+Sg+Tra: колыг

     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: колум
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: колын
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: колэ
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [колме̄н, колмен]
# (2007: 30) short elsewhere not
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: колы̄н
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: колэ̄н
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: колув
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: колы̄н
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: коланыл
     кол+N+Sg+Loc: колт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: колумт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: колынт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: колэт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: колме̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: колы̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: колэ̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: колувт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: колы̄нт
     кол+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: коланылт
     кол+N+Du+Loc: колыгт
     кол+N+Pl+Loc: колытт
# (Скрибник & Афанасьева 2007: 78) analogue
     кол+N+Du+Nom: колыг
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: колагум
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: колагын
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: колаге
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: колагме̄н
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: колагы̄н
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: колаге̄н
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: колагув
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: колагы̄н
     кол+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: колаганыл
     кол+N+Pl+Nom: колыт
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: коланум
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: коланын
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: коланэ
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: коланме̄н
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: коланы̄н
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: коланэ̄н
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: коланув
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: коланы̄н
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: колананыл
